Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.220

Antitrust revolving fund—Expenditures.

The attorney general is authorized to expend from the antitrust revolving fund, created by RCW 43.10.210 through 43.10.220, such funds as are necessary for the payment of costs, expenses and charges incurred in the preparation, institution and maintenance of antitrust actions under the state and federal antitrust acts. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the attorney general may expend from the antitrust revolving fund for the purposes of the consumer protection activities of the office.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 926; 2002 c 371 s 907; 1999 c 309 s 916; 1974 ex.s. c 162 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.

Severability—Effective date—2002 c 371: See notes following RCW 9.46.100.

Severability—Effective date—1999 c 309: See notes following RCW 41.06.152.